Utah statutes.
76-9-903.   Gang loitering -- Failure to disperse -- Penalties.

(1)  When a law enforcement officer observes a person whom the officer reasonably believes to be a member of a criminal street gang engaging in gang loitering in the presence of one or more other persons in any public place where gang loitering is prohibited under Section 76-9-905, the police officer shall:

(a)  inform all the persons that they are within an area in which loitering by a group containing one or more criminal street gang members is prohibited;

(b)  order all the persons in the group to disperse and remove themselves from within sight and hearing of the location where the officer issues the order to disperse; and

(c)  inform the persons that any person in the group will be subject to being charged with a criminal offense and will also be subject to arrest if the person fails to promptly obey the order to disperse.

(2)  The officer under Subsection (1) shall also advise the persons the officer is directing to disperse that each of the persons directed to disperse is subject to being charged with a criminal offense and will also be subject to arrest if the person is again, within eight hours after the current order to disperse is made:

(a)  present in a public place with a group that includes one or more persons a peace officer reasonably believes to be a member of a criminal street gang; and

(b)  within sight or hearing of the location where the law enforcement officer is currently issuing the order to disperse.

